Illinois, session 104th, HB3247.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 522-105 and by changing Section 27A-5 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/22-105 new)7    Sec. 22-105. Denial of free education prohibited. 8    (a) The purpose of this Section is to secure the right of 9every child to equal access to a free public education and a 10school that is safe from intimidation and fear, consistent 11with the landmark United States Supreme Court decision in 12Plyler v. Doe, 457 U.S. 202 (1982), as in effect on January 1, 132025, which held that it is unconstitutional for states to 14deny children a free public education based on immigration 15status. In their efforts to promote the right to educational 16equality established in Plyler, schools must take steps to 17protect the integrity of school learning environments for all 18children, so that no parent is discouraged from sending and no 19child is discouraged from attending school, including from the 20threat of immigration enforcement or other law enforcement 21activity on a school campus.22    (b) As used in this Section:23    "Citizenship or immigration status" means all matters   HB3247 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 11044 LNS 21126 b1regarding citizenship of the United States or any other 2country or the authority or lack thereof to reside in or 3otherwise to be present in the United States, including an 4individual's nationality and country of citizenship.5    "Law enforcement agent" means an agent of federal, State, 6or local law enforcement authorized with the power to arrest 7or detain individuals or manage the custody of detained 8individuals for a law enforcement purpose, including civil 9immigration enforcement. "Law enforcement agent" does not 10include a school resource officer as defined in Section 1110-20.68 of this Code. 12    "Nonjudicial warrant" means a warrant issued by a federal, 13State, or local agency authorized with the power to arrest or 14detain individuals or manage the custody of detained 15individuals for any law enforcement purpose, including civil 16immigration enforcement. "Nonjudicial warrant" includes an 17immigration detainer or civil immigration warrant as defined 18in the Illinois TRUST Act. "Nonjudicial warrant" does not 19include a criminal warrant issued upon a judicial 20determination of probable cause, in compliance with the 21requirements of the Fourth Amendment to the United States 22Constitution and Section 6 of Article I of the Illinois 23Constitution. 24    "Prevailing party" includes any party:25        (1) who obtains some of his or her requested relief 26    through a judicial judgment in his or her favor;  HB3247 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 11044 LNS 21126 b1        (2) who obtains some of his or her requested relief 2    through a settlement agreement approved by the court; or3        (3) whose pursuit of a non-frivolous claim was a 4    catalyst for a unilateral change in position by the 5    opposing party relative to the relief sought.6    "School" means every public school, school district, and 7governing body, including a special charter district or 8charter school, organized under this Code, and its agents, 9including a contracted party.10    (c) No child may be denied a free public education through 11secondary school while in this State based on the child's 12perceived or actual immigration status or the child's parent's 13or guardian's perceived or actual citizenship or immigration 14status.15        (1) A school must not exclude a child from 16    participation in or deny a child the benefits of any 17    program or activity on the grounds of that child's 18    perceived or actual immigration status or the child's 19    parent's or guardian's actual or perceived citizenship or 20    immigration status.21        (2) A school must not use policies or procedures or 22    engage in practices that have the effect of excluding a 23    child from participation in or denying the benefits of any 24    program or activity or the effect of excluding 25    participation of the child's parent or guardian from 26    parental engagement activities or programs because of the   HB3247 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 11044 LNS 21126 b1    child's perceived or actual immigration status or the 2    child's parent's or guardian's actual or perceived 3    immigration status. These policies, procedures, and 4    practices include:5            (A) requesting or collecting information or 6        documentation from a student or the student's parent 7        or guardian about citizenship or immigration status 8        unless required by State or federal law; and9            (B) designating immigration status, citizenship, 10        place of birth, nationality, or national origin as 11        directory information, as that term is defined by 12        federal and State law.13        (3) A school must not perform any of the following 14    actions:15            (A) Threaten to disclose anything related to the 16        actual or perceived citizenship or immigration status 17        of a child or a person associated with the child to any 18        other person or entity or an immigration or law 19        enforcement agency.20            (B) Disclose anything related to the perceived 21        citizenship or immigration status of a child or a 22        person associated with the child to any other person 23        or entity or an immigration or law enforcement agency 24        if the school does not have direct knowledge of the 25        child's or associated person's actual citizenship or 26        immigration status, subject to the requirements of   HB3247 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 11044 LNS 21126 b1        this paragraph (3).2            (C) Disclose anything related to the actual 3        citizenship or immigration status of a child or a 4        person associated with the child to any other person 5        or nongovernmental entity if the school has direct 6        knowledge of the child's or associated person's actual 7        citizenship or immigration status, subject to the 8        requirements of this paragraph (3).9        Nothing in subparagraphs (B) and (C) of this paragraph 10    (3) may be construed to permit the disclosure of student 11    records or information without complying with State and 12    federal requirements governing the disclosure of such 13    records or information. Subparagraphs (B) and (C) of this 14    paragraph (3) may not be construed to prohibit or restrict 15    an entity from sending to or receiving from the United 16    States Department of Homeland Security or any other 17    federal, State, or local governmental entity information 18    regarding the citizenship or immigration status of an 19    individual under Sections 1373 and 1644 of Title 8 of the 20    United States Code.21        (4) A school must develop procedures for reviewing and 22    authorizing requests from law enforcement agents 23    attempting to enter a school or school facility by July 1, 24    2026. The procedures must comply with the requirements of 25    paragraph (2) of this subsection (c), and, at a minimum, 26    include the following:  HB3247 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 11044 LNS 21126 b1            (A) procedures for reviewing and contacting a 2        designated authorized person at the school or school 3        facility and the district superintendent's office or 4        school administrative office, who may contact the 5        school's legal counsel, and procedures for that 6        authorized person or legal counsel to review requests 7        to enter a school or school facility, including 8        judicial warrants, nonjudicial warrants, and 9        subpoenas;10            (B) procedures for monitoring or accompanying and 11        procedures for documenting all interactions with law 12        enforcement agents while on the school's premises; and13            (C) procedures for notifying and seeking consent 14        from a student's parents or guardian or from the 15        student if the student is 18 years old or older or 16        emancipated if a law enforcement agent requests access 17        to a student for immigration enforcement purposes, 18        unless such access is in compliance with a judicial 19        warrant or subpoena that restricts the disclosure of 20        the information to the student's parent or guardian.21        This paragraph (4) is subject to subsection (c) of 22    Section 22-88 of this Code.23    (d) A school shall adopt a policy for complying with 24paragraphs (1), (2), (3), and (4) of subsection (c) by July 1, 252026.26    (e) Beginning July 1, 2026, any party aggrieved by conduct   HB3247 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 11044 LNS 21126 b1that violates subsection (c) may bring a civil lawsuit. This 2lawsuit must be brought no later than 2 years after the 3violation of subsection (c). If the court finds that a willful 4violation of paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subsection (c) has 5occurred, the court may award actual damages. The court, as it 6deems appropriate, may grant, as relief, any permanent or 7preliminary negative or mandatory injunction, temporary 8restraining order, or other order.9    (f) Nothing in this Section may be construed to require an 10exhaustion of the administrative complaint process before 11civil law remedies may be pursued.12    (g) Upon a motion, a court shall award reasonable 13attorney's fees and costs, including expert witness fees and 14other litigation expenses, to a plaintiff who is a prevailing 15party in any action brought under subsection (c). In awarding 16reasonable attorney's fees, the court shall consider the 17degree to which the relief obtained relates to the relief 18sought.19    (h) The General Assembly finds and declares that this 20Section is a State law within the meaning of subsection (d) of 21Section 1621 of Title 8 of the United States Code. 22    (105 ILCS 5/27A-5)23    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 102-466)24    Sec. 27A-5. Charter school; legal entity; requirements. 25    (a) A charter school shall be a public, nonsectarian,   HB3247 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 11044 LNS 21126 b1nonreligious, non-home based, and non-profit school. A charter 2school shall be organized and operated as a nonprofit 3corporation or other discrete, legal, nonprofit entity 4authorized under the laws of the State of Illinois.5    (b) A charter school may be established under this Article 6by creating a new school or by converting an existing public 7school or attendance center to charter school status. In all 8new applications to establish a charter school in a city 9having a population exceeding 500,000, operation of the 10charter school shall be limited to one campus. This limitation 11does not apply to charter schools existing or approved on or 12before April 16, 2003.13    (b-5) (Blank). 14    (c) A charter school shall be administered and governed by 15its board of directors or other governing body in the manner 16provided in its charter. The governing body of a charter 17school shall be subject to the Freedom of Information Act and 18the Open Meetings Act. A charter school's board of directors 19or other governing body must include at least one parent or 20guardian of a pupil currently enrolled in the charter school 21who may be selected through the charter school or a charter 22network election, appointment by the charter school's board of 23directors or other governing body, or by the charter school's 24Parent Teacher Organization or its equivalent. 25    (c-5) No later than January 1, 2021 or within the first 26year of his or her first term, every voting member of a charter   HB3247 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 11044 LNS 21126 b1school's board of directors or other governing body shall 2complete a minimum of 4 hours of professional development 3leadership training to ensure that each member has sufficient 4familiarity with the board's or governing body's role and 5responsibilities, including financial oversight and 6accountability of the school, evaluating the principal's and 7school's performance, adherence to the Freedom of Information 8Act and the Open Meetings Act, and compliance with education 9and labor law. In each subsequent year of his or her term, a 10voting member of a charter school's board of directors or 11other governing body shall complete a minimum of 2 hours of 12professional development training in these same areas. The 13training under this subsection may be provided or certified by 14a statewide charter school membership association or may be 15provided or certified by other qualified providers approved by 16the State Board. 17    (d) For purposes of this subsection (d), "non-curricular 18health and safety requirement" means any health and safety 19requirement created by statute or rule to provide, maintain, 20preserve, or safeguard safe or healthful conditions for 21students and school personnel or to eliminate, reduce, or 22prevent threats to the health and safety of students and 23school personnel. "Non-curricular health and safety 24requirement" does not include any course of study or 25specialized instructional requirement for which the State 26Board has established goals and learning standards or which is   HB3247 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 11044 LNS 21126 b1designed primarily to impart knowledge and skills for students 2to master and apply as an outcome of their education.3    A charter school shall comply with all non-curricular 4health and safety requirements applicable to public schools 5under the laws of the State of Illinois. The State Board shall 6promulgate and post on its Internet website a list of 7non-curricular health and safety requirements that a charter 8school must meet. The list shall be updated annually no later 9than September 1. Any charter contract between a charter 10school and its authorizer must contain a provision that 11requires the charter school to follow the list of all 12non-curricular health and safety requirements promulgated by 13the State Board and any non-curricular health and safety 14requirements added by the State Board to such list during the 15term of the charter. Nothing in this subsection (d) precludes 16an authorizer from including non-curricular health and safety 17requirements in a charter school contract that are not 18contained in the list promulgated by the State Board, 19including non-curricular health and safety requirements of the 20authorizing local school board. 21    (e) Except as otherwise provided in the School Code, a 22charter school shall not charge tuition; provided that a 23charter school may charge reasonable fees for textbooks, 24instructional materials, and student activities.25    (f) A charter school shall be responsible for the 26management and operation of its fiscal affairs, including, but   HB3247 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 11044 LNS 21126 b1not limited to, the preparation of its budget. An audit of each 2charter school's finances shall be conducted annually by an 3outside, independent contractor retained by the charter 4school. The contractor shall not be an employee of the charter 5school or affiliated with the charter school or its authorizer 6in any way, other than to audit the charter school's finances. 7To ensure financial accountability for the use of public 8funds, on or before December 1 of every year of operation, each 9charter school shall submit to its authorizer and the State 10Board a copy of its audit and a copy of the Form 990 the 11charter school filed that year with the federal Internal 12Revenue Service. In addition, if deemed necessary for proper 13financial oversight of the charter school, an authorizer may 14require quarterly financial statements from each charter 15school. 16    (g) A charter school shall comply with all provisions of 17this Article, the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act, 18all federal and State laws and rules applicable to public 19schools that pertain to special education and the instruction 20of English learners, and its charter. A charter school is 21exempt from all other State laws and regulations in this Code 22governing public schools and local school board policies; 23however, a charter school is not exempt from the following:24        (1) Sections 10-21.9 and 34-18.5 of this Code 25    regarding criminal history records checks and checks of 26    the Statewide Sex Offender Database and Statewide Murderer   HB3247 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 11044 LNS 21126 b1    and Violent Offender Against Youth Database of applicants 2    for employment;3        (2) Sections 10-20.14, 10-22.6, 22-100, 24-24, 34-19, 4    and 34-84a of this Code regarding discipline of students;5        (3) the Local Governmental and Governmental Employees 6    Tort Immunity Act;7        (4) Section 108.75 of the General Not For Profit 8    Corporation Act of 1986 regarding indemnification of 9    officers, directors, employees, and agents;10        (5) the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act;11        (5.5) subsection (b) of Section 10-23.12 and 12    subsection (b) of Section 34-18.6 of this Code;13        (6) the Illinois School Student Records Act;14        (7) Section 10-17a of this Code regarding school 15    report cards;16        (8) the P-20 Longitudinal Education Data System Act;17        (9) Section 27-23.7 of this Code regarding bullying 18    prevention;19        (10) Section 2-3.162 of this Code regarding student 20    discipline reporting;21        (11) Sections 22-80 and 27-8.1 of this Code;22        (12) Sections 10-20.60 and 34-18.53 of this Code;23        (13) Sections 10-20.63 and 34-18.56 of this Code;24        (14) Sections 22-90 and 26-18 of this Code;25        (15) Section 22-30 of this Code; 26        (16) Sections 24-12 and 34-85 of this Code;  HB3247 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 11044 LNS 21126 b1        (17) the Seizure Smart School Act;2        (18) Section 2-3.64a-10 of this Code;3        (19) Sections 10-20.73 and 34-21.9 of this Code;4        (20) Section 10-22.25b of this Code;5        (21) Section 27-9.1a of this Code;6        (22) Section 27-9.1b of this Code; 7        (23) Section 34-18.8 of this Code;8        (25) Section 2-3.188 of this Code;9        (26) Section 22-85.5 of this Code; 10        (27) subsections (d-10), (d-15), and (d-20) of Section 11    10-20.56 of this Code; 12        (28) Sections 10-20.83 and 34-18.78 of this Code; 13        (29) Section 10-20.13 of this Code; 14        (30) Section 28-19.2 of this Code; 15        (31) Section 34-21.6 of this Code;16        (32) Section 22-85.10 of this Code;17        (33) Section 2-3.196 of this Code; 18        (34) Section 22-95 of this Code; 19        (35) Section 34-18.62 of this Code;20        (36) the Illinois Human Rights Act; and21        (37) Section 2-3.204 of this Code. 22    The change made by Public Act 96-104 to this subsection 23(g) is declaratory of existing law.24    (h) A charter school may negotiate and contract with a 25school district, the governing body of a State college or 26university or public community college, or any other public or   HB3247 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 11044 LNS 21126 b1for-profit or nonprofit private entity for: (i) the use of a 2school building and grounds or any other real property or 3facilities that the charter school desires to use or convert 4for use as a charter school site, (ii) the operation and 5maintenance thereof, and (iii) the provision of any service, 6activity, or undertaking that the charter school is required 7to perform in order to carry out the terms of its charter. 8Except as provided in subsection (i) of this Section, a school 9district may charge a charter school reasonable rent for the 10use of the district's buildings, grounds, and facilities. Any 11services for which a charter school contracts with a school 12district shall be provided by the district at cost. Any 13services for which a charter school contracts with a local 14school board or with the governing body of a State college or 15university or public community college shall be provided by 16the public entity at cost.17    (i) In no event shall a charter school that is established 18by converting an existing school or attendance center to 19charter school status be required to pay rent for space that is 20deemed available, as negotiated and provided in the charter 21agreement, in school district facilities. However, all other 22costs for the operation and maintenance of school district 23facilities that are used by the charter school shall be 24subject to negotiation between the charter school and the 25local school board and shall be set forth in the charter.26    (j) A charter school may limit student enrollment by age   HB3247 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 11044 LNS 21126 b1or grade level.2    (k) If the charter school is authorized by the State 3Board, then the charter school is its own local education 4agency. 5(Source: P.A. 102-51, eff. 7-9-21; 102-157, eff. 7-1-22; 6102-360, eff. 1-1-22; 102-445, eff. 8-20-21; 102-522, eff. 78-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-676, eff. 12-3-21; 8102-697, eff. 4-5-22; 102-702, eff. 7-1-23; 102-805, eff. 91-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-175, 10eff. 6-30-23; 103-472, eff. 8-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 11103-641, eff. 7-1-24; 103-806, eff. 1-1-25; revised 10-9-24.) 12    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 102-466)13    Sec. 27A-5. Charter school; legal entity; requirements. 14    (a) A charter school shall be a public, nonsectarian, 15nonreligious, non-home based, and non-profit school. A charter 16school shall be organized and operated as a nonprofit 17corporation or other discrete, legal, nonprofit entity 18authorized under the laws of the State of Illinois.19    (b) A charter school may be established under this Article 20by creating a new school or by converting an existing public 21school or attendance center to charter school status. In all 22new applications to establish a charter school in a city 23having a population exceeding 500,000, operation of the 24charter school shall be limited to one campus. This limitation 25does not apply to charter schools existing or approved on or   HB3247 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 11044 LNS 21126 b1before April 16, 2003.2    (b-5) (Blank). 3    (c) A charter school shall be administered and governed by 4its board of directors or other governing body in the manner 5provided in its charter. The governing body of a charter 6school shall be subject to the Freedom of Information Act and 7the Open Meetings Act. A charter school's board of directors 8or other governing body must include at least one parent or 9guardian of a pupil currently enrolled in the charter school 10who may be selected through the charter school or a charter 11network election, appointment by the charter school's board of 12directors or other governing body, or by the charter school's 13Parent Teacher Organization or its equivalent. 14    (c-5) No later than January 1, 2021 or within the first 15year of his or her first term, every voting member of a charter 16school's board of directors or other governing body shall 17complete a minimum of 4 hours of professional development 18leadership training to ensure that each member has sufficient 19familiarity with the board's or governing body's role and 20responsibilities, including financial oversight and 21accountability of the school, evaluating the principal's and 22school's performance, adherence to the Freedom of Information 23Act and the Open Meetings Act, and compliance with education 24and labor law. In each subsequent year of his or her term, a 25voting member of a charter school's board of directors or 26other governing body shall complete a minimum of 2 hours of   HB3247 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 11044 LNS 21126 b1professional development training in these same areas. The 2training under this subsection may be provided or certified by 3a statewide charter school membership association or may be 4provided or certified by other qualified providers approved by 5the State Board. 6    (d) For purposes of this subsection (d), "non-curricular 7health and safety requirement" means any health and safety 8requirement created by statute or rule to provide, maintain, 9preserve, or safeguard safe or healthful conditions for 10students and school personnel or to eliminate, reduce, or 11prevent threats to the health and safety of students and 12school personnel. "Non-curricular health and safety 13requirement" does not include any course of study or 14specialized instructional requirement for which the State 15Board has established goals and learning standards or which is 16designed primarily to impart knowledge and skills for students 17to master and apply as an outcome of their education.18    A charter school shall comply with all non-curricular 19health and safety requirements applicable to public schools 20under the laws of the State of Illinois. The State Board shall 21promulgate and post on its Internet website a list of 22non-curricular health and safety requirements that a charter 23school must meet. The list shall be updated annually no later 24than September 1. Any charter contract between a charter 25school and its authorizer must contain a provision that 26requires the charter school to follow the list of all   HB3247 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 11044 LNS 21126 b1non-curricular health and safety requirements promulgated by 2the State Board and any non-curricular health and safety 3requirements added by the State Board to such list during the 4term of the charter. Nothing in this subsection (d) precludes 5an authorizer from including non-curricular health and safety 6requirements in a charter school contract that are not 7contained in the list promulgated by the State Board, 8including non-curricular health and safety requirements of the 9authorizing local school board. 10    (e) Except as otherwise provided in the School Code, a 11charter school shall not charge tuition; provided that a 12charter school may charge reasonable fees for textbooks, 13instructional materials, and student activities.14    (f) A charter school shall be responsible for the 15management and operation of its fiscal affairs, including, but 16not limited to, the preparation of its budget. An audit of each 17charter school's finances shall be conducted annually by an 18outside, independent contractor retained by the charter 19school. The contractor shall not be an employee of the charter 20school or affiliated with the charter school or its authorizer 21in any way, other than to audit the charter school's finances. 22To ensure financial accountability for the use of public 23funds, on or before December 1 of every year of operation, each 24charter school shall submit to its authorizer and the State 25Board a copy of its audit and a copy of the Form 990 the 26charter school filed that year with the federal Internal   HB3247 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 11044 LNS 21126 b1Revenue Service. In addition, if deemed necessary for proper 2financial oversight of the charter school, an authorizer may 3require quarterly financial statements from each charter 4school. 5    (g) A charter school shall comply with all provisions of 6this Article, the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act, 7all federal and State laws and rules applicable to public 8schools that pertain to special education and the instruction 9of English learners, and its charter. A charter school is 10exempt from all other State laws and regulations in this Code 11governing public schools and local school board policies; 12however, a charter school is not exempt from the following:13        (1) Sections 10-21.9 and 34-18.5 of this Code 14    regarding criminal history records checks and checks of 15    the Statewide Sex Offender Database and Statewide Murderer 16    and Violent Offender Against Youth Database of applicants 17    for employment;18        (2) Sections 10-20.14, 10-22.6, 22-100, 24-24, 34-19, 19    and 34-84a of this Code regarding discipline of students;20        (3) the Local Governmental and Governmental Employees 21    Tort Immunity Act;22        (4) Section 108.75 of the General Not For Profit 23    Corporation Act of 1986 regarding indemnification of 24    officers, directors, employees, and agents;25        (5) the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act;26        (5.5) subsection (b) of Section 10-23.12 and   HB3247 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 11044 LNS 21126 b1    subsection (b) of Section 34-18.6 of this Code;2        (6) the Illinois School Student Records Act;3        (7) Section 10-17a of this Code regarding school 4    report cards;5        (8) the P-20 Longitudinal Education Data System Act;6        (9) Section 27-23.7 of this Code regarding bullying 7    prevention;8        (10) Section 2-3.162 of this Code regarding student 9    discipline reporting;10        (11) Sections 22-80 and 27-8.1 of this Code;11        (12) Sections 10-20.60 and 34-18.53 of this Code;12        (13) Sections 10-20.63 and 34-18.56 of this Code;13        (14) Sections 22-90 and 26-18 of this Code;14        (15) Section 22-30 of this Code; 15        (16) Sections 24-12 and 34-85 of this Code;16        (17) the Seizure Smart School Act;17        (18) Section 2-3.64a-10 of this Code;18        (19) Sections 10-20.73 and 34-21.9 of this Code;19        (20) Section 10-22.25b of this Code;20        (21) Section 27-9.1a of this Code;21        (22) Section 27-9.1b of this Code; 22        (23) Section 34-18.8 of this Code; 23        (24) Article 26A of this Code;24        (25) Section 2-3.188 of this Code;25        (26) Section 22-85.5 of this Code; 26        (27) subsections (d-10), (d-15), and (d-20) of Section   HB3247 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 11044 LNS 21126 b1    10-20.56 of this Code; 2        (28) Sections 10-20.83 and 34-18.78 of this Code; 3        (29) Section 10-20.13 of this Code; 4        (30) Section 28-19.2 of this Code; 5        (31) Section 34-21.6 of this Code;6        (32) Section 22-85.10 of this Code; 7        (33) Section 2-3.196 of this Code; 8        (34) Section 22-95 of this Code; 9        (35) Section 34-18.62 of this Code;10        (36) the Illinois Human Rights Act; and11        (37) Section 2-3.204 of this Code; and . 12        (38) Section 22-105 of this Code. 13    The change made by Public Act 96-104 to this subsection 14(g) is declaratory of existing law.15    (h) A charter school may negotiate and contract with a 16school district, the governing body of a State college or 17university or public community college, or any other public or 18for-profit or nonprofit private entity for: (i) the use of a 19school building and grounds or any other real property or 20facilities that the charter school desires to use or convert 21for use as a charter school site, (ii) the operation and 22maintenance thereof, and (iii) the provision of any service, 23activity, or undertaking that the charter school is required 24to perform in order to carry out the terms of its charter. 25Except as provided in subsection (i) of this Section, a school 26district may charge a charter school reasonable rent for the   HB3247 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 11044 LNS 21126 b1use of the district's buildings, grounds, and facilities. Any 2services for which a charter school contracts with a school 3district shall be provided by the district at cost. Any 4services for which a charter school contracts with a local 5school board or with the governing body of a State college or 6university or public community college shall be provided by 7the public entity at cost.8    (i) In no event shall a charter school that is established 9by converting an existing school or attendance center to 10charter school status be required to pay rent for space that is 11deemed available, as negotiated and provided in the charter 12agreement, in school district facilities. However, all other 13costs for the operation and maintenance of school district 14facilities that are used by the charter school shall be 15subject to negotiation between the charter school and the 16local school board and shall be set forth in the charter.17    (j) A charter school may limit student enrollment by age 18or grade level.19    (k) If the charter school is authorized by the State 20Board, then the charter school is its own local education 21agency. 22(Source: P.A. 102-51, eff. 7-9-21; 102-157, eff. 7-1-22; 23102-360, eff. 1-1-22; 102-445, eff. 8-20-21; 102-466, eff. 247-1-25; 102-522, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-676, 25eff. 12-3-21; 102-697, eff. 4-5-22; 102-702, eff. 7-1-23; 26102-805, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-154, eff.   HB3247 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 11044 LNS 21126 b16-30-23; 103-175, eff. 6-30-23; 103-472, eff. 8-1-24; 103-605, 2eff. 7-1-24; 103-641, eff. 7-1-24; 103-806, eff. 1-1-25; 3revised 11-26-24.) 4    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 5changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 6that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 7represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 8not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 9made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 10Public Act.